seg/mar.2.dix
    <pardef n="__det">
      <e>      <p><l>तो</l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ती</l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ते</l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्या<j/></l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ति<j/></l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्या<j/></l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>      
      <e>      <p><l>त्या<j/></l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ति<j/></l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्या<j/></l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>


      <e>      <p><l>ते</l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्या</l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ती</l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यां<j/></l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यां<j/></l><r>तो<s n="det"/><s n="dist"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>

      <e>      <p><l>हा</l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ही</l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>हे</l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ह्या<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>या<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>हि<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ह्या<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>      
      <e r="LR"><p><l>या<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>      
      <e>      <p><l>ह्या<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>या<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>हि<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ह्या<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>या<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>      


      <e>      <p><l>हे</l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ह्या</l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>या</l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ह्या</l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>या</l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ह्यां<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>यां<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ह्यां<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>यां<j/></l><r>हा<s n="det"/><s n="prox"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>एक</l><r>एक<s n="det"/><s n="indef"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>एका</l><r>एक<s n="det"/><s n="indef"/><s n="obl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
    </pardef>




    <!-- copula -->

    

    <!-- adjectives -->
    
    <pardef n="/लाल__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="काळ/ा__adj">
       <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ं</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>्या</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>्या</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="क/सा__adj">
       <e>     <p><l>सा</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>शी</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>शे</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>से</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>सं</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>   <p><l>शी</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>शे</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>से</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>श्या</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>शा</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>शी</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>श्या</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>शा</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="">                 <i></i><par n="__det" /></e>
    <e lm="सगळ्यात">                         <i>सगळ्यात</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="सर्वोत्कृष्ट">                    <i>सर्वोत्कृष्ट</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="अन्य">           <i>अन्य</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="राजकीय">           <i>राजकीय</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="ऐतिहासिक">        <i>ऐतिहासिक</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="सार्वजनिक">     <i>सार्वजनिक</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="कादंबरी">           <i>कादंबरी</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="मुस्लिम">           <i>मुस्लिम</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="तरुण">                    <i>तरुण</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="सुप्रसिद्ध">  <i>सुप्रसिद्ध</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="लहान">                  <i>लहान</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="मऊ">                        <i>मऊ</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="निःषेश">                         <i>निःषेश</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="संगची">                          <i>संगची</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="पातालयंत्री">                    <i>पातालयंत्री</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="लोकरी">                          <i>लोकरी</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="वोजोड">                          <i>वोजोड</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="निर्लेप">                        <i>निर्लेप</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="दग्गोचर">                        <i>दग्गोचर</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="वज्रलेप">                        <i>वज्रलेप</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="निनावी">                         <i>निनावी</i><par n="/लाल__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="आपअआपला">                        <i>आपअआपल</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="भरचा">                           <i>भरच</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="घरचा">                           <i>घरच</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="फिरता">                          <i>फिरत</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="थोरला">                          <i>थोरल</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="बारका">                          <i>बारक</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="बोलविता">                        <i>बोलवित</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="चुळबुळा">                        <i>चुळबुळ</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="गोडबोला">                        <i>गोडबोल</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="ज्ञाता">                         <i>ज्ञात</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="करिताचा">                        <i>करिताच</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="लंबाडा">                         <i>लंबाड</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="मधचा">                           <i>मधच</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="नाचारा">                         <i>नाचार</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="पाठकोरा">                        <i>पाठकोर</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="पुढला">                          <i>पुढल</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="समीपला">                         <i>समीपल</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="विरहितचा">                       <i>विरहितच</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="दीडदमडीचा">                      <i>दीडदमडीच</i><par n="काळ/ा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="आडोसा">                          <i>आडो</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="आपलासा">                         <i>आपला</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="आपलासा">                         <i>आपला</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="छोटासा">                         <i>छोटा</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="खासा">                           <i>खा</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="फारसा">                          <i>फार</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="फोपसा">                          <i>फोप</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="असा">                            <i>अ</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="बराचसा">                         <i>बराच</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="इवलासा">                         <i>इवला</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="जसा">                            <i>ज</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="जसजसा">                          <i>जसज</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="काहीसा">                         <i>काही</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="कानोसा">                         <i>कानो</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="कसा">                            <i>क</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="लहानसा">                         <i>लहान</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="नाहीसा">                         <i>नाही</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="पुरेसा">                         <i>पुरे</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
    <e lm="तसतसा">                          <i>तसत</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
